Hawaii statutes.
§386-208 Guaranty mechanism. In the
event of a liquidation pursuant to section 386-207, after exhausting the
security required pursuant to section 386-194(b)(2), the insurance commissioner
shall levy an assessment against all groups to assure prompt payment of
benefits. The assessment on each group shall be based on the proportion that
the premium of each group bears to the total premium of all groups. The
insurance commissioner may exempt a group from assessment upon finding that the
payment of the assessment would render the group insolvent. The assessment
shall not relieve any member of an insolvent group of its joint and several
liability. After any assessment is made, the insurance commissioner shall take
action to enforce the joint and several liability provisions of the insolvent
group's indemnity agreement and shall recoup:

(1) All costs incurred by the insurance commissioner
in enforcing the joint and several liability;

(2) Amounts that the insurance commissioner assessed
any other groups pursuant to this section; and

(3) Any obligation included within section
386-207(f). [L 1986, c 304, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next